Maryland, session 2026, HB0495.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–104.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CIVIL IMMIGRATION VIOLATION” MEANS A VIOLATION OF
FEDERAL CIVIL IMMIGRATION LAW.
(3) “FAMILY MEMBER” MEANS A RELATIVE BY BLOOD, ADOPTION, OR
MARRIAGE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0495*

HOUSE BILL 495
(4) “HOUSEHOLD MEMBER” MEANS A PERSON WHO LIVES WITH
ANOTHER OR IS A REGULAR PRESENCE IN THE HOME OF ANOTHER.
(5) “IMMIGRATION ARREST” MEANS TAKING AN INDIVIDUAL INTO
CUSTODY SOLELY OR PRIMARILY BASED ON THE SUSPICION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
HAS COMMITTED A CIVIL IMMIGRATION VIOLATION.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL DULY AND IN GOOD FAITH ATTENDING A COURT
PROCEEDING IN WHICH THE INDIVIDUAL IS A PARTY OR POTENTIAL WITNESS, OR A
FAMILY MEMBER OR HOUSEHOLD MEMBER OF A PARTY OR POTENTIAL WITNESS, IS
IMMUNE FROM IMMIGRATION ARREST WHILE GOING TO, REMAINING AT, OR
RETURNING FROM THE LOCATION OF THE COURT PROCEEDING UNLESS THE
IMMIGRATION ARREST IS AUTHORIZED BY A VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT MAKE AN IMMIGRATION ARREST IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT MAKE AN IMMIGRATION ARREST IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION THAT RESULTS IN SERIOUS BODILY
INJURY.
(D) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT
NOT EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR BOTH.
(2) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION IS
GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 4 YEARS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR BOTH.
(E) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN OR HAS REASONABLE GROUNDS
TO BELIEVE THAT THE INDIVIDUAL WILL BE SUBJECT TO AN IMMIGRATION ARREST
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR:
(I) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COURT COSTS.
(2) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION ON BEHALF OF
THE STATE OR AS PARENS PATRIAE ON BEHALF OF PERSONS RESIDING IN THE
STATE WHO HAVE BEEN OR WHO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL HAS REASONABLE

HOUSE BILL 495 3
GROUNDS TO BELIEVE MAY BE SUBJECT TO IMMIGRATION ARREST IN VIOLATION OF
THIS SECTION FOR:
(I) DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF; AND
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OR AGENT OR EMPLOYEE OF A COURT FROM ACTING IN
GOOD FAITH TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC SAFETY IN A COURTHOUSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.